Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
Article 1 General Provisions

26-2-1.
Definitions of and standards for lard, mixed edible fats, and cottonseed oils.

The standards for lard, mixed edible fats, and cottonseed oils are defined as follows:

“Lard” means the fat of freshly slaughtered swine. It shall not be made from a diseased animal or any portion of an animal unfit for food or contain less than 99 percent of pure fat.

“Mixed edible fat” means a mixture which contains not less than 99 percent of sweet mixed fat and may consist of a mixture of refined cottonseed oil or other edible vegetable oils with sweet beef fat or other edible animal fat and shall be sold under a registered or proprietary brand and properly labeled with a distinctive trademark or name bearing the name of the manufacturer.

“Edible cottonseed oil” means refined cottonseed oil, free from disagreeable taste or odors. White cottonseed oil for edible purposes is cottonseed oil which has been refined in such a manner as to be nearly colorless, flavorless, and odorless. Winter cottonseed oils for edible purposes are those from which a portion of the stearine has been removed; they may be either white or yellow.

History.

Ga. L. 1906, p. 83, § 21; Civil Code 1910, § 2115; Code 1933, § 42-111; Ga. L. 1956, p. 195, § 23.

26-2-2.
Meat, fish, and poultry to be sold by net weight; exceptions; penalty.

All meat, meat products, fish, and poultry offered or exposed for sale or sold commercially shall be sold by net weight only except when sold for immediate consumption on the premises or when sold as a cooked food but not in a package or when sold for breeding purposes or when sold as pets or for other purposes than for human or animal consumption.

Any person who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 75, §§ 1, 2.

26-2-3.
Obstruction of inspectors and others in performance of duties.

Any manufacturer, dealer, or other person who shall impede, obstruct, hinder, or otherwise prevent or attempt to prevent any inspector or other person in the performance of his duty in collecting samples or otherwise in connection with this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction thereof, be fined not less than $10.00 nor more than $50.00. Any violation of this chapter, relating to feeding stuffs for domestic animals, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding $50.00 or imprisonment not exceeding 30 days, or both, in the discretion of the court.

History.

Ga. L. 1906, p. 83, § 20; Penal Code 1910, § 452; Code 1933, § 42-9905.

26-2-4.
Labeling, sale, or advertising of spring water.

As used in this Code section, the term “spring water” means water which is: (1) derived from an underground formation from which water flows naturally to the surface of the earth; (2) not derived from a municipal system or public water supply; and (3) collected only at the spring or through a bore hole into the same underground water-bearing zone; provided, however, that water collected with the assistance of external force to protect the water shall retain all the physical properties of and be of the same chemical composition and quality as the water that flows naturally to the surface.

Any water which meets the definition of “spring water” as specified in subsection (a) of this Code section may lawfully be labeled, sold, advertised, and otherwise represented as “spring water” or “natural spring water,” notwithstanding any other contrary provision of any law or regulation of this state. No law or regulation of this state shall: (1) require or be construed to require any disclaimer in connection with such labeling, sale, advertisement, or representation; or (2) require or be construed to require such water to be additionally identified as any other type of water.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-2-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1016, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 26/HB 90.

The 2015 amendment,

effective March 13, 2015, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “provided, however, that water” for “provided, however, water” in subsection (a).